Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
572B]

CIVIL
UNIONS

Section

572B-1 Definitions

572B-2 Eligibility to enter into a civil union

572B-3 Civil unions void; when

572B-4 Solemnization; license to perform; refusal
to

join persons in a civil union

572B-4.5 Rights held by reciprocal beneficiaries
who enter

into a civil union

572B-5 Applicants for civil union; license
required;

limitations

572B-6 Application for license for persons who
wish to

enter into a civil union; fee

572B-7 Persons under control of conservator or
guardian

572B-8 Record of solemnization; reported by whom;

affidavit; evidentiary weight of
certificate

or affidavit

572B-9 Benefits, protections, and
responsibilities

572B-9.5 Religious organizations; exemption under
certain

circumstances

572B-10 Unions performed in other jurisdictions

572B-11 References and inclusions

Note

L 2012, c 267, §§16 and 17 provide:

"SECTION 16. [Section
retroactive to October 3, 2011. L 2012, c 267, §20(1).] If two
individuals terminated a reciprocal beneficiary relationship on or after
October 3, 2011, but before the date this Act became law upon its approval [Act
effective retroactive to January 1, 2012, and approved July 6, 2012], and
the two individuals subsequently enter or entered into a civil union no later
than ninety days after their reciprocal beneficiary relationship terminated,
their reciprocal beneficiary relationship shall be deemed to continue
uninterrupted until the civil union is or was solemnized. The couple shall
suffer no loss or interruption of any rights, benefits, protections, or
obligations derived from their reciprocal beneficiary relationship, and those
rights, benefits, protections, or obligations shall be deemed to have accrued
as of the first date they existed under the beneficiary relationship, if they
meet the requirements of this section.

For purposes of this section, holding title to property as
tenants by the entirety shall be included among the rights of a reciprocal
beneficiary relationship that shall continue uninterrupted under this section;
provided that no intervening liens were perfected and attached on the property
after the reciprocal beneficiary relationship was terminated, and before the
date this Act became law upon its approval [Act effective retroactive to
January 1, 2012, and approved July 6, 2012].

SECTION 17. Notwithstanding subsection 572C-7(c), Hawaii
Revised Statutes, if before the effective date of this section [retroactive
to January 1, 2012], two individuals entered into a valid legal union in
another jurisdiction that is not a marriage recognized under chapter 572,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, and is substantially equivalent to a civil union under
chapter 572B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and are also parties to a reciprocal
beneficiary relationship in this State, the reciprocal beneficiary relationship
shall terminate and their valid legal union entered into in another
jurisdiction shall be recognized as a civil union under section 572B-10, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, on the voluntary termination of the reciprocal beneficiary
relationship under subsection 572C-7(a), Hawaii Revised Statutes, but no later
than one year after the date this Act becomes law upon its approval [Act
effective retroactive to January 1, 2012, and approved July 6, 2012]."

Civil union or reciprocal beneficiary relationship in
existence before December 2, 2013, not invalidated by L Sp 2013 2d, c 1. L Sp
2013 2d, c 1, §11.

Cross References

Civil unions, public employees' retirement system, see
§88-1.2.

Continuity of rights; civil union and reciprocal
beneficiary relationships, see §572-1.7.

Law Journals and Reviews

Baehr v. Lewin and the Long Road to Marriage Equality. 33 UH
L. Rev. 705 (2011).

Case Notes

The passage of the civil unions law did not render Hawaii's
existing marriage laws irrational and unconstitutional. 884 F. Supp. 2d 1065
(2012).

Complaint challenging the constitutionality of the civil
unions law was moot because Act 267, L 2012, amended the civil unions law
retroactively to add an immunity provision [§572B-9.5], which provided immunity
for religious organizations that refused to make their facilities available for
solemnizing civil unions. Granting leave to amend complaint would be futile
because the action would remain nonjusticiable; plaintiffs did not demonstrate
that they had standing or that the action was ripe. 903 F. Supp. 2d 1024
(2012).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next